California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The board, however, may provide by resolution for the payment of claims against the district without the prior specific approval thereof by the board, subject to such conditions as prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

40080.

None of the territory which is within the district shall be annexed to any other transit district unless the board, by resolution, approves the annexation of such territory to such other transit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40081.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules adopted by the board, and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings and Legislation [40085. - 40089.]

40085.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in a manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40086.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40088.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution or ordinance. No ordinance, resolution or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors. District ordinances shall be adopted in the same manner as provided for adoption of ordinances by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40089.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows: “Be it ordained by the board of directors of the Orange County Transit District.” All ordinances shall be signed by the chairman or vice chairman of the board and attested by the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Officers [40095. - 40098.]

40095.

The board may appoint and fix the salary of a general manager who shall have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district, and of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

40096.

The board may designate the Treasurer, the Auditor, the County Counsel, and the Clerk of the County of Orange as the treasurer, auditor, counsel, and clerk of the district, and the treasury of that county may be designated the depositary for district funds for such time as the board may determine. Any costs incurred by the Treasurer, Auditor, County Counsel, and Clerk of the County of Orange in performing services for the district shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

40097.

The treasurer shall be the custodian of the funds of the district and shall make payments only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the chairman of the board or any other person so authorized by the board. The treasurer shall keep an account of all receipts and disbursements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

40098.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law which requires warrants to be paid by the county auditor, the district treasurer shall pay the warrant if sufficient district funds are available.

In the event that the district designates the treasury of the County of Orange to be the depository of district funds and the county auditor is not designated as the district auditor, a listing of warrants issued by the district shall be submitted to the county auditor, upon his request, on the same day the warrants are issued. The form and content of the warrant listing shall be as prescribed by the board and approved by the county
 auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Labor Provisions [40120. - 40129.]

40120.

Whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, the district, upon determining as provided in Section 40122 that the labor organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall enter into a written contract with the accredited representative of those employees governing wages, salaries,
 hours, and working conditions. In case of a dispute over wages, salaries, hours, or working conditions, which is not resolved by negotiations in good faith between the district and the labor organization, upon the request of both, the district and the labor organization may submit the dispute to the decision of the majority of an arbitration board, and the decision of the majority of the arbitration board shall be final. The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district, and two representatives of the labor organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of the fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the district have stricken four names, shall be designated as the
 arbitrator. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties thereto. The expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties. Each party shall bear his or her own costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 124.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

40121.

No contract or agreement shall be made with any labor organization, association, group, or individual, or be assumed under the provisions of this section, where such organization, association, group, or individual denies membership to or in any manner discriminates against any employee on the grounds of race, creed, color or sex; provided, that such organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence. The district shall not discriminate in regard to employment against any person because of his race, creed, or color.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40122.

If there is a question whether a labor organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the State Conciliation Service for disposition. The State Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing after due notice to all interested parties and shall thereupon determine the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining. In making such determination and in establishing rules and regulations governing petitions, the conduct of hearings and elections, the State Conciliation Service shall be guided by relevant federal law and administrative practice, developed under the
 Labor-Management Relations Act, 1947, as presently amended.

The State Conciliation Service shall provide for an election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties. Any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later; provided, that no collective bargaining agreement shall be construed to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40122.1.

(a) The Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code, and the powers and duties of that board, as described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, shall apply, as appropriate, to this chapter and shall include the authority as set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) A complaint alleging any violation of this chapter or of any rules and regulations adopted by the district shall be processed as an unfair practice charge by the Public Employment Relations Board. The initial determination as to whether the charge of unfair practice is justified and, if so, the appropriate remedy necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, shall be a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Public
 Employment Relations Board, except that in an action to recover damages due to an unlawful strike, the Public Employment Relations Board shall have no authority to award strike-preparation expenses as damages, and shall have no authority to award damages for costs, expenses, or revenue losses incurred during, or as a consequence of, an unlawful strike. The Public Employment Relations Board shall apply and interpret unfair labor practices consistent with existing judicial interpretations of this chapter.

(c) The Public Employment Relations Board shall not find it an unfair practice for an employee organization to violate a rule or regulation adopted by a public agency if that rule or regulation is itself in violation of this chapter. This subdivision shall not be construed to restrict or expand that board’s jurisdiction or authority as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 713, Sec. 1.   (AB 355)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

40122.2.

(a) Any charging party, respondent, or intervenor aggrieved by a final decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board in an unfair practice case, except a decision of that board not to issue a complaint in such a case, may petition for a writ of extraordinary relief from that decision or order.

(b) A petition for a writ of extraordinary relief shall be filed in the district court of appeal having jurisdiction over the county where the events giving rise to the decision or order occurred. The petition shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, or order denying reconsideration, as applicable. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause
 notice to be served upon the Public Employment Relations Board and thereafter shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless that time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant any temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper, and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board. The findings of the Public Employment Relations Board with respect to questions of fact, including ultimate facts, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. Title 1 (commencing with Section 1067) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs shall, except where specifically superseded by this section, apply
 to proceedings pursuant to this section.

(c) If the time to petition for extraordinary relief from a Public Employment Relations Board decision or order has expired, the Public Employment Relations Board may seek enforcement of any final decision or order in a district court of appeal or superior court having jurisdiction over the county where the events giving rise to the decision or order occurred. The Public Employment Relations Board shall respond within 10 days to any inquiry from a party to the action as to why the Public Employment Relations Board has not sought court enforcement of the final decision or order. If the response does not indicate that there has been compliance with the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, the Public Employment Relations Board shall seek enforcement of the final decision or order upon the request of the party. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record
 of the proceeding, certified by that board, and appropriate evidence disclosing the failure to comply with the decision or order. If, after hearing, the court determines that the order was issued pursuant to the procedures established by the Public Employment Relations Board and that the person or entity refuses to comply with the order, the court shall enforce the order by writ of mandamus or other proper process. The court may not review the merits of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 713, Sec. 2.   (AB 355)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

40123.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, the district shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts. To the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such acquired public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination, subject to all the rights and benefits of this part, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, vacation and pension credits in accordance with the records and labor agreements of the acquired public utility.
 Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system or other benefits established by that public utility shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of his wages, seniority, pension, vacation or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

The district may extend the benefits of this section to officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40124.

Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 40221) of this part, the district shall not acquire any existing system or part thereof whether by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise. The district shall not dispose of or lease to any transit system or part thereof, nor merge, consolidate or coordinate any transit system or part thereof, or reduce or limit the lines or service of any existing system or of its system, or terminate any lease arrangement or management contract, unless it shall first give notice of such contemplated action to the collective bargaining agent of the employees who are or may be affected thereby. The terms and conditions
 of employment affected by such action shall be a proper subject of collective bargaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40125.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Code, employees of this district may authorize and, upon such authorization, the district may make deductions from wages and salaries of such employees:

(1) Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments. 

(2) For the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension or retirement plan.

(3) For any
 purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40126.

The obligation of the district to bargain in good faith with a duly designated or certified labor organization and to execute a written collective bargaining agreement with such labor organization covering the wages, hours and working conditions of the employees represented by such labor organization in an appropriate unit, and to comply with the terms thereof shall not be limited or restricted by the provisions of the Government Code or other laws or statutes and the obligation of the district to bargain collectively shall extend to all subjects of collective bargaining which are or may be proper subjects of collective bargaining with a private employer, including
 retroactive provisions. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Code or other laws or statutes, the district shall make deductions from wages and salaries of its employees upon receipt of authorization therefor for the payment of union dues, fees or assessments, for the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension plan or for any other purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer, where such deductions are pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40127.

The district may provide for a retirement system; provided, that the adoption, terms and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district represented by a labor organization in accordance with this section shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between such labor organization and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40128.

The district shall take the necessary steps to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under Subchapter II of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, as amended.

However, the district is not required to provide coverage under Subchapter II of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, for employees who are members of the Orange County Employees Retirement System. Notwithstanding Section 31557 of the Government Code, administrative and professional employees may be admitted to membership in the Orange County Employees
 Retirement System without making membership applicable to all employees of the district. The board, by resolution, shall determine which employees are employed in administrative and professional classifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

40129.

The district shall take such steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation disability and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1454.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [40130. - 40130.]

40130.

The Orange County Employees Retirement System and the laws relating thereto or as hereafter amended shall be applicable to the officers and employees of the district, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 40120) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [40160. - 40201.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [40160. - 40163.]

40160.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40161.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40162.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district in exercising such power shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction or relocation of any structure, railway, mains, pipes, conduits, cables or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

No such taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of property of a railroad corporation, as defined in
 Section 230 of this code, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------

40163.

All the provisions of the County Transportation Commissions Act (Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000)), regarding the powers and functions of the Orange County Transportation Authority shall be equally applicable to the Orange County Transit District as if set forth herein, and shall be in addition to the powers and functions set forth in this part. The board of directors shall determine which provisions are applicable to the conduct of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 752, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [40165. - 40166.]

40165.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40166.

No officer or employee of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [40175. - 40176.]

40175.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40176.

Exercise of the powers provided under Section 40175 shall be undertaken in the same manner and pursuant to the same procedures as in the exercise of like powers by the County of Orange, except as may otherwise be expressly provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [40180. - 40187.]

40180.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the district underground, upon or above the ground and under, upon or over public streets or other public ways, or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons or vehicles thereto and may acquire any interest in or rights to the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided that:

(a) Installations in
 state freeways shall be subject to the approval of the State Department of Public Works and installations in other state highways shall be subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670), Chapter 3, Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) Installations in city streets, parks, or other property devoted to municipal use, shall be subject to the approval of the city council having jurisdiction thereof.

The district may acquire, contract and negotiate for the services of any and all employees of any public or private agency or corporation operating transit facilities within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40180.5.

The district may make bulk purchases of passenger tickets for scheduled passenger rail services provided by the National Railroad Passenger Corporation during peak hours, as defined by subdivision (a) of Section 99260.2, on Monday through Friday, inclusive.

The district may resell to residents of the district the tickets at less than the cost to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1002.)
-------------------------------------------

40181.

The district may without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may without limitation by any other provisions of this part enter into any contracts and cooperation with and accept cooperation from the state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such transit
 facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40182.

The district may acquire, construct, own, or operate air terminal facilities within the district and, with the consent of the county in which such facilities are located, outside of the district, and may accept contributions of money, labor, materials, and any other property from, and enter into any contract and cooperation with, the federal government or the state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1061.)
-------------------------------------------

40183.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm or private corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40184.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state, and to install adequate bus stops, including the painting of curbs, subject to the governing body in charge of such streets, highways, stream, watercourse or lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40185.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any city, public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within, or without, the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40186.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40187.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to the operation of buses and to the rules and regulations prescribed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [40200. - 40201.]

40200.

The district shall have the power to obtain temporary transfers of funds in accordance with the last paragraph of Section 31, Article IV of the State Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40201.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions or loans from the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, the United States, this state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency of either thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such
 transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or this state in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation or in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Existing Systems [40221. - 40224.]

40221.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Establish” includes establish, construct, complete, acquire, extend, or reroute. It does not, however, include the maintenance and operation of any existing system acquired by the district.

(b) “Existing system” means any transit service or system of a publicly or privately owned public utility situated entirely within Orange County, or at least 75 percent of whose revenue vehicle miles for the preceding calendar year were operated within Orange County, and has been in operation since at least
 January 1, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 493, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

40222.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, before the district may propose to establish any transit service or system which may at any time divert, lessen, or compete for the patronage or revenues of any existing system, the district shall give a written notice to the public utility which is operating the existing system. The written notice shall describe the transit service or system which the district proposes to establish and shall state the time within which the district proposes to establish the service or system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

40222.5.

The district shall not establish the proposed service or system, or maintain and operate the service or system until it has completed the purchase of the existing system or any part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40223.

The purchase price to be paid for the existing system, or any portion thereof to be purchased, shall be the reproduction cost new, including going concern value, at the date upon which the district commences negotiations for the purchase of the existing system, or the portion of the existing system, less depreciation, including wear, tear, and obsolescence, if any.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 493, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

40223.5.

The district and the public utility operating the existing system may agree upon the purchase price or they may agree that the purchase price is to be established by arbitration and upon the method of naming arbitrators and the method of conducting such arbitration. If they do not, the purchase price may be fixed and judgment entered thereon in a suit brought either by the public utility or the district in the superior court in and for the county in which is located that portion of the existing system to be acquired by the district which has the highest value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40224.

Section 851 does not apply to any contract for sale or sale of an existing system, or any portion thereof, pursuant to this chapter, and the Public Utilities Commission has no jurisdiction with respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 108.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds [40225. - 40266.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance [40225. - 40237.]

40225.

The district may from time to time incur a bonded indebtedness as provided in this chapter to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district. The total amount of bonds issued and outstanding shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the County of Orange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40226.

Whenever the board by resolution passed by vote of two-thirds of all its members determines that the public interest or necessity demands the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any transit facilities or any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes, or powers of the district, the cost of which will be too great to be paid out of the ordinary annual income and revenue of the district, it may at any subsequent meeting of the board provide by ordinance for the submission of the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness for the purpose set forth in the resolution to
 the voters of the district at a special bond election held for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40231.

The ordinance calling a special bond election shall fix the date on which the election will be held, and the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against incurring the indebtedness. It shall also recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the transit facilities, works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property proposed to be acquired, constructed, or completed, the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the indebtedness, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannually or annually the
 first year and thereafter semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40232.

Propositions for incurring indebtedness for more than one object or purpose may be submitted at the same election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40233.

Any special bond election may be held separately, or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. If a special bond election is consolidated with any other election, the provisions of this chapter setting forth the procedure for the calling and holding of the special bond election shall be complied with, except that the ordinance calling the election need not set forth the election precincts, polling places, and officers of election, but may provide that the precincts, polling places, and officers of election shall be the same as those set forth in the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings calling the
 election with which the special bond election is consolidated, and shall refer to the ordinance, notice, or other proceedings by number and title, or by other definite description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40234.

The ordinance shall be published, and no other notice of election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40235.

The board shall comply with Article 3 (commencing with Section 9160) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, the provisions of which are applicable to any bond election held pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

40236.

The votes of sixty percent (60%) of all voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40237.

If the proposition submitted at a special bond election fails to receive the requisite number of votes, the board shall not within six months after the election hold another special election for the submission of a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness substantially the same as the proposition voted upon at the prior election unless a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 15 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election is filed with the board, requesting that the proposition, or a proposition substantially the same, be submitted at an election to be called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Form and Content [40240. - 40243.]

40240.
